Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1649
Roads of district; part of county road system; special levy; limitation; receipts; rural road improvement district fund.

(1) When the road improvements have been completed and accepted, the roads shall constitute a part of the county road system and shall be maintained by the county.

(2) The owners of more than fifty percent of the area in the district may petition the board for maintenance in excess of that given to other similar county roads. If such petition is made, the board may levy and collect annually a special levy of not to exceed three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars on all taxable property in the district subject to section 77-3443.

(3) Money that is collected pursuant to a special levy under this section shall be credited to the rural road improvement district fund for such district and used only for the repair and maintenance of the roads in the district where such special levy was imposed.

Laws 1963, c. 213, § 12, p. 684;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 163;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 143;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 59;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 61.
July 18, 2026